Utah statutes.
70A-2-701.   Remedies for breach of collateral contracts not impaired.

Remedies for breach of any obligation or promise collateral or ancillary to a contract for sale are not impaired by the provisions of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 154, 1965 General Session

